Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 3
Informal Probate and Appointment Proceedings

§ 15-3-301. Informal probate or appointment proceedings — Application — Contents.

Applications for informal probate, informal statement of intestacy where the estate is community and there is a surviving spouse, or informal appointment shall be directed to the registrar, and verified by the applicant to be accurate and complete to the best of his knowledge and belief as to the following information:

Every application for informal probate of a will, informal statement of intestacy where the estate is community and there is a surviving spouse, or for informal appointment of a personal representative, other than a special, ancillary or successor representative, shall contain the following:

A statement of the interest of the applicant;

The name, and date of death of the decedent, his age, and the county and state of his domicile at the time of death, and the names and addresses of the spouse, children, heirs and devisees and the ages of any who are minors so far as known or ascertainable with reasonable diligence by the applicant;

If the decedent was not domiciled in the state at the time of his death, a statement showing venue;

A statement identifying and indicating the address of any personal representative of the decedent appointed in this state or elsewhere whose appointment has not been terminated;

A statement indicating whether the applicant has received a demand for notice, or is aware of any demand for notice of any probate or appointment proceeding concerning the decedent that may have been filed in this state or elsewhere;

If the application is for an informal statement of intestacy of a community estate where there is a surviving spouse, an affidavit of the surviving spouse or someone acting on behalf of the surviving spouse that there is no will, that the decedent’s estate consists solely of community property of the decedent and surviving spouse, that he or she is the surviving spouse, and a request for a statement that there is no will, that all assets are community and that the surviving spouse is the sole heir;

That the time limit for informal probate or appointment as provided in this article has not expired either because three (3) years or less have passed since the decedent’s death, or, if more than three (3) years from death have passed, that circumstances as described by section 15-3-108[, Idaho Code,] of this code authorizing tardy probate appointment have occurred.

An application for informal probate of a will shall state the following in addition to the statements required by subsection (a) of this section:

That the original of the decedent’s last will is in the possession of the court, or accompanies the application, or that a certified copy of a will probated in another jurisdiction accompanies the application;

That the applicant, to the best of his knowledge, believes the will to have been validly executed;

That after the exercise of reasonable diligence, the applicant is unaware of any instrument revoking the will, and that the applicant believes that the instrument which is the subject of the application is the decedent’s last will.

An application for informal appointment of a personal representative to administer an estate under a will shall describe the will by date of execution and state the time and place of probate or the pending application or petition for probate. The application for appointment shall adopt the statements in the application or petition for probate and state the name, address and priority for appointment of the person whose appointment is sought.

An application for informal appointment of an administrator in intestacy shall state in addition to the statements required by subsection (a) of this section:

That after the exercise of reasonable diligence, the applicant is unaware of any unrevoked testamentary instrument relating to property having a situs in this state under section 15-1-301[, Idaho Code,] of this code, or, a statement why any such instrument of which he may be aware is not being probated;

The priority of the person whose appointment is sought and the names of any other persons having a prior or equal right to the appointment under section 15-3-203[, Idaho Code,] of this code.

An application for appointment of a personal representative to succeed a personal representative appointed under a different testacy status shall refer to the order in the most recent testacy proceeding, state the name and address of the person whose appointment is sought and of the person whose appointment will be terminated if the application is granted, and describe the priority of the applicant.

An application for appointment of a personal representative to succeed a personal representative who has tendered a resignation as provided in subsection (c) of section 15-3-610[, Idaho Code,] of this code, or whose appointment has been terminated by death or removal, shall adopt the statements in the application or petition which led to the appointment of the person being succeeded except as specifically changed or corrected, state the name and address of the person who seeks appointment as successor, and describe the priority of the applicant.

By verifying an application for informal probate, or informal appointment, the applicant submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding for relief from fraud relating to the application, or for perjury, that may be instituted against him.

Any statement entered upon an application for informal statement of intestacy where the estate is community and there is a surviving spouse shall contain a statement of heirship setting out the heirs of the decedent and shall have the same effect as entry of a statement of informal probate of a will and be subject to the limitation periods set out in section 15-3-108, Idaho Code, notwithstanding the exception provided in that section for determining heirs of an intestate.

§ 15-3-302. Informal probate — Duty of registrar — Effect of informal probate.

Upon receipt of an application requesting informal probate of a will or informal statement of intestacy, the registrar, upon making the findings required by section 15-3-303[, Idaho Code,] of this chapter shall issue a written statement of informal probate if at least five (5) days have elapsed since the decedent’s death. Informal probate is conclusive as to all persons until superseded by an order in a formal testacy proceeding. No defect in the application or procedure relating thereto which leads to informal probate of a will renders the probate void.

§ 15-3-303. Informal probate — Proof and findings required.

In an informal proceeding for original probate of a will or informal statement of intestacy where the estate is community and there is a surviving spouse, the registrar shall determine whether:

The application is complete;

The applicant has made oath or affirmation that the statements contained in the application are true to the best of his knowledge and belief;

The applicant appears from the application to be an interested person as defined in subsection (25) of section 15-1-201, Idaho Code;

On the basis of the statements in the application, venue is proper;

An original, duly executed and apparently unrevoked will is in the registrar’s possession;

Any notice required by section 15-3-204, Idaho Code, has been given and that the application is not within section 15-3-304, Idaho Code;

It appears from the application that the time limit for original probate has not expired; and

If the application is for a statement of intestacy of a community estate with a surviving spouse, on the basis of statements in the application and affidavit: 1. the decedent left no will, 2. the decedent’s estate consists solely of community property of the decedent and the surviving spouse, and 3. the decedent left a surviving spouse. In addition to this, the registrar shall set out the name of the surviving spouse.

The application shall be denied if it indicates that a personal representative has been appointed in another county of this state or, except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, if it appears that this or another will of the decedent has been the subject of a previous probate order.

A will which appears to have the required signatures and which contains an attestation clause showing that requirements of execution under section 15-2-502, 15-2-503 or 15-2-506, Idaho Code, have been met shall be probated without further proof. In other cases, the registrar may assume execution if the will appears to have been properly executed, or he may accept a sworn statement or affidavit of any person having knowledge of the circumstances of execution, whether or not the person was a witness to the will.

Informal probate of a will that has been previously probated elsewhere may be granted at any time upon written application by any interested person, together with deposit of an authenticated copy of the will and of the statement probating it from the office or court where it was first probated.

A will from a place that does not provide for probate of a will after death, and that is not eligible for probate under subsection (a) of this section, may be probated in this state upon receipt by the registrar of a duly authenticated copy of the will and a duly authenticated certificate of its legal custodian that the copy filed is a true copy and that the will has become operative under the law of the other place.

§ 15-3-303A. Notice required. — Upon issuance of a statement of informal probate if no letters are issued to a personal representative or determination of heirship of community property, the applicant must give notice to all heirs and devisees of the admission of the will to probate or the determination of heirship of community property. This information shall be sent by ordinary mail to each of the heirs and devisees whose address is reasonably available to the applicant. The applicant shall be responsible to any heir or devisee damaged by failure of the applicant to give proper notice under this section.

§ 15-3-303B. In personam jurisdiction. [Repealed.]

§ 15-3-304. Informal probate — Unavailable in certain cases.

Applications for informal probate which relate to one (1) or more of a known series of testamentary instruments (other than a will and one (1) or more codicils thereto), the latest of which does not expressly revoke the earlier, shall be declined.

§ 15-3-305. Informal probate — Registrar not satisfied.

If the registrar is not satisfied that a will is entitled to be probated in informal proceedings because of failure to meet the requirements of sections 15-3-303 and 15-3-304[, Idaho Code,] of this Part or any other reason, he may decline the application. A declination of informal probate is not an adjudication and does not preclude formal probate proceedings.

§ 15-3-306. Informal probate — Notice requirements.

The moving party must give notice as described by section 15-1-401[, Idaho Code,] of this code of his application for informal probate (1) to any person demanding it pursuant to section 15-3-204[, Idaho Code,] of this code; and (2) to any personal representative of the decedent whose appointment has not been terminated. No other notice of informal probate is required.

§ 15-3-307. Informal appointment proceedings — Delay in order — Duty of registrar — Effect of appointment.

Upon receipt of an application for informal appointment of a personal representative other than a special administrator as provided in section 15-3-614[, Idaho Code,] of this code, if at least one hundred twenty (120) hours have elapsed since the decedent’s death, the registrar, after making the findings required by section 15-3-308[, Idaho Code,] of this chapter, shall appoint the applicant subject to qualification and acceptance; provided, that if the decedent was a nonresident, the registrar shall delay the order of appointment until thirty (30) days have elapsed since death unless the personal representative appointed at the decedent’s domicile is the applicant, or unless the decedent’s will directs that his estate be subject to the laws of this state.

The status of personal representative and the powers and duties pertaining to the office are fully established by informal appointment. An appointment, and the office of personal representative created thereby, is subject to termination as provided in sections 15-3-608 through 15-3-612[, Idaho Code,] of this code, but is not subject to retroactive vacation.

§ 15-3-308. Informal appointment proceedings — Proof and findings required.

In informal appointment proceedings, the registrar must determine whether:

The application for informal appointment of a personal representative is complete;

The applicant has made oath or affirmation that the statements contained in the application are true to the best of his knowledge and belief;

The applicant appears from the application to be an interested person as defined in subsection (25) of section 15-1-201, Idaho Code;

On the basis of the statements in the application, venue is proper;

Any will to which the requested appointment relates has been formally or informally probated; but this requirement does not apply to the appointment of a special administrator;

Any notice required by section 15-3-204, Idaho Code, has been given;

From the statements in the application, the person whose appointment is sought has priority entitling him to the appointment.

Unless section 15-3-612, Idaho Code, controls, the application must be denied if it indicates that a personal representative who has not filed a written statement of resignation as provided in subsection (c) of section 15-3-610, Idaho Code, has been appointed in this or another county of this state, that (unless the applicant is the domiciliary personal representative or his nominee) the decedent was not domiciled in this state, and that a personal representative whose appointment has not been terminated has been appointed by a court in the state of domicile, or that other requirements of this section have not been met.

§ 15-3-309. Informal appointment proceedings — Registrar not satisfied.

If the registrar is not satisfied that a requested informal appointment of a personal representative should be made because of failure to meet the requirements of sections 15-3-307 and 15-3-308[, Idaho Code,] of this Part, or for any other reason, he may decline the application. A declination of informal appointment is not an adjudication and does not preclude appointment in formal proceedings.

§ 15-3-310. Informal appointment proceedings — Notice requirements.

The moving party must give notice as described by section 15-1-401[, Idaho Code,] of this code of his intention to seek an appointment informally: (1) to any person demanding it pursuant to section 15-3-204[, Idaho Code,] of this code; and (2) to any person having a prior or equal right to appointment not waived in writing and filed with the court. No other notice of an informal appointment proceeding is required.

§ 15-3-311. Informal appointment unavailable in certain cases.

If an application for informal appointment indicates the existence of a possible unrevoked testamentary instrument which may relate to property subject to the laws of this state, and which is not filed for probate in this court, the registrar shall decline the application.